Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-711
Warrants; how executed.

All warrants drawn upon the city treasurer of a city of the second class or village treasurer must be signed by the mayor or chairperson of the village board of trustees and countersigned by the city clerk or village clerk, stating the particular fund to which the same is chargeable, the person to whom payable, and for what particular object. No money shall be otherwise paid than upon such warrants so drawn. Each warrant shall specify the amount included in the adopted budget statement for such fund upon which it is drawn and the amount already expended of such fund.

Laws 1879, § 66, p. 210;

R.S.1913, § 5190;

C.S.1922, § 4380;

C.S.1929, § 17-578;

R.S.1943, § 17-711;

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 22, p. 686;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 223.

Where warrants were drawn by the mayor and city clerk for the purchase of an addition to a cemetery, the title to which was later refused by the city council, without a prior appropriation therefor or without the sanction of a majority of the legal voters, the mayor and clerk who drew such warrant are liable to the city for the funds of the city so withdrawn through such warrant. City of Blair v. Lantry, 21 Neb. 247, 31 N.W. 790 (1887).